Missouri, session 2026, HB2481.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 208.009, RSMo, is repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 208.009 and 208.019, to read as follows:
208.009. 1. An individual who is not a United States citizen or a national of the
United States shall not be eligible to receive food assistance through the Supplemental
Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) unless such individual meets the definition of an
eligible alien under 7 U.S.C. 2015(f) and meets the definition of a qualified alien under 8
U.S.C. 1641(b).
2. No alien unlawfully present in the United States shall receive any state or local
public benefit, except for state or local public benefits that may be offered under 8 U.S.C.
1621(b). Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the rendering of emergency
medical care, prenatal care, services offering alternatives to abortion, emergency assistance,
or legal assistance to any person.
[2.] 3. As used in this section, "public benefit" means any grant, contract, or loan
provided by an agency of state or local government; or any retirement, welfare, health,
disability, housing, or food assistance benefit under which payments, assistance, credits, or
reduced rates or fees are provided. The term "public benefit" shall not include postsecondary
education public benefits as defined in section 173.1110, any municipal permit, or contracts
or agreements between public utility providers and their customers or unemployment benefits
payable under chapter 288. The unemployment compensation program shall verify the lawful
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2481 2
presence of an alien for the purpose of determining eligibility for benefits in accordance with
its own procedures.
[3.] 4. In addition to providing proof of other eligibility requirements, at the time of
application for any state or local public benefit, an applicant [who is eighteen years of age or
older] shall provide affirmative proof that the applicant is a United States citizen [or a
permanent resident of the United States or is lawfully present in the United States], United
States national, or alien with an immigration status eligible for public benefits. Such
affirmative proof shall include documentary evidence recognized by the department of
revenue when processing an application for a driver's license, a Missouri driver's license, as
well as any document issued by the federal government that confirms an alien's lawful
presence in the United States and alien status that is eligible for public benefits. [In
processing applications for public benefits, an employee of an agency of state or local
government shall not inquire about the legal status of a custodial parent or guardian applying
for a public benefit on behalf of his or her dependent child who is a citizen or permanent
resident of the United States.
4.] 5. An applicant who cannot provide the proof required under this section at the
time of application may alternatively sign an affidavit under oath, attesting to either United
States citizenship or classification by the United States as an alien lawfully admitted [for
permanent residence] and eligible for public benefits, in order to receive temporary benefits
or a temporary identification document as provided in this section. The affidavit shall be on
or consistent with forms prepared by the state or local government agency administering the
state or local public benefits and shall include the applicant's Social Security number or any
applicable federal identification number and an explanation of the penalties under state law
for obtaining public assistance benefits fraudulently.
[5.] 6. An applicant who has provided the sworn affidavit required under subsection
[4] 5 of this section is eligible to receive temporary public benefits as follows:
(1) (a) For the minimum period required under federal or, if no minimum
period is required under federal law, for ninety days or until such time that it is determined
that the applicant is not lawfully present in the United States or otherwise ineligible for
public benefits due to immigration status, whichever is earlier; or
[(2)] (b) Indefinitely if the applicant provides a copy of a completed application for a
birth certificate that is pending in Missouri or some other state. An extension granted under
this subsection shall terminate upon the applicant's receipt of a birth certificate or a
determination that a birth certificate does not exist because the applicant is not a United States
citizen.
(2) Failure to submit acceptable documentation establishing United States
citizenship, United States national status, or alien status eligible for such public benefits

HCS HB 2481 3
within the temporary eligibility period shall result in denial or termination of public
benefits.
(3) No additional period of eligibility for temporary benefits shall be granted to
any application who has previously been denied public benefits at any time due to a
failure to verify United States citizenship, United States national status, or alien status
eligible for such public benefits.
[6.] 7. An applicant who is an alien shall not receive any state or local public benefit
unless the alien's lawful presence in the United States is first verified by the federal
government. State and local agencies administering public benefits in this state shall
cooperate with the United States Department of Homeland Security in achieving verification
of an alien's lawful presence in the United States in furtherance of this section. The system
utilized [may] shall include, but not be limited to, the Systematic Alien Verification for
Entitlements Program operated by the United States Department of Homeland Security.
[After an applicant's lawful presence in the United States has been verified through the
Systematic Alien Verification for Entitlements Program, no additional verification is required
within the same agency of the state or local government.]
8. A match through any electronic or data verification system shall not, by itself,
be accepted as proof of identity. Every applicant for public benefits shall be required to
provide documentary proof of United States citizenship, United States national status,
or alien status eligible for such public benefits under subsection 4 of this section.
[7.] 9. The provisions of this section shall not be construed to require any nonprofit
organization duly registered with the Internal Revenue Service to enforce the provisions of
this section, nor does it prohibit such an organization from providing aid.
[8.] 10. Any agency that administers public benefits shall provide assistance in
obtaining appropriate documentation to persons applying for public benefits who sign the
affidavit required by subsection 4 of this section stating they are eligible for such benefits but
lack the documents required under subsection 3 of this section.
11. Any agency that administers public benefits shall verify that the applicant or
enrollee of that public benefit is a United States citizen, United States national, or an
eligible alien for such public benefit through the Systematic Alien Verification for
Entitlements Program operated by the United States Department of Homeland Security
and any other verification system at the time of application, at each eligibility
redetermination, and whenever information is received indicating a change in
circumstances affecting eligibility related to citizenship or immigration status.
(1) If verification confirms that an applicant or enrollee is not lawfully present in
the United States or no longer qualifies under subsections 1, 2, 3 of this section or any
successor provision of state and federal law, the agency that administers that public

HCS HB 2481 4
benefit shall immediately terminate future benefits and initiate disenrollment, except as
otherwise permitted for temporary benefits under subsection 5 of this section.
(2) If any agency that administers public benefits is unable to determine an
applicant’s or enrollee’s lawful presence after a Systematic Alien Verification for
Entitlements Program query or other authorized verification, the agency shall
immediately suspend approval or continuation of benefits and refer the case to the
United States Department of Homeland Security or other appropriate federal agency
for investigation and enforcement action. No public benefits shall be paid or continued
100 unless and until lawful presence is conclusively verified, except as otherwise permitted
101 for temporary benefits under subsection 5 of this section.
102 (3) The appropriate agency for referral for an applicant or enrollee for whom
103 any agency is unable to verify lawful presence shall include, but not be limited to, the
104 United States Department of Agriculture.
105 12. When administering SNAP benefits, the department of social services shall:
106 (1) Consider the entire income and financial resources of any individual
107 rendered ineligible to receive SNAP benefits under subsection 1 of this section when
108 determining the eligibility and benefit allotment of the household of which such
109 individual is a member; and
110 (2) Notwithstanding any options provided under 7 CFR Section 273.11(c)(3), not
111 prorate or exclude the income or financial resources of ineligible individuals under
112 subsection 1 of this section. All such income and resources shall be fully considered.
208.019. 1. The director of the department of social services shall prepare and
submit a request for a waiver to the United States Department of Agriculture to
authorize the state to operate the supplemental nutrition assistance program (SNAP) in
a manner that prioritizes healthy foods and nutritional value, discourages foods that are
high in added sugar and ultra processed, and supports Missouri agriculture.
2. Alterations made under the waiver, if received, shall be designed to support
the purchase of a wide variety of whole and minimally processed healthy food categories
including, but not limited to:
(1) Fresh fruits and vegetables;
(2) Meat, fish, poultry, and other proteins;
(3) Dairy products;
(4) Whole grains and bread products; and
(5) Legumes.
3. The director of the department of social services shall explore and recommend
other strategies to further incentivize the purchase of fresh fruits, vegetables, and

HCS HB 2481 5
Missouri-produced meat and dairy products within the SNAP program by utilizing and
enhancing existing Missouri healthy food education and access programs.
✔